Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4970.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [473.686] IMMIGRANT DETENTION FLIGHTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commission" means the Metropolitan Airports Commission established under section 473.603. new text end new text begin (c) "Detained individual" means an aircraft passenger who is traveling involuntarily or being held in any kind of restraint other than a seatbelt. new text end new text begin (d) "ICE Air" means the U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement Air Operations division that facilitates the transfer and removal of undocumented immigrants on commercial airlines and chartered flights. new text end new text begin (e) "MSP" means the Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport. new text end new text begin (f) "Signature Aviation" means the entity that operates the Signature Aviation terminal. new text end new text begin (g) "Signature Aviation terminal" means the terminal at MSP operated by Signature Aviation that accommodates private international and business flights. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Notice required. new text end new text begin Signature Aviation must notify the commission of each flight chartered by ICE Air that arrives at or departs from the Signature Aviation terminal. Each notification must include: new text end new text begin (1) the number of passengers who are detained individuals; new text end new text begin (2) the number of detained individuals who are under 18 years of age; new text end new text begin (3) the scheduled arrival and departure times; and new text end new text begin (4) the origin and destination. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Streaming video. new text end new text begin (a) The commission must install, maintain, and operate a camera capable of recording and streaming footage live on the Internet 24 hours per day. The camera must be installed in a location that allows for recording and streaming footage of the loading and unloading of all passengers on flights chartered by ICE Air at the Signature Aviation terminal. The livestream footage must be accessible to the public on the commission's website. new text end new text begin (b) Upon receiving notification under subdivision 2, commission staff must monitor the loading and unloading of each flight chartered by ICE Air arriving at and departing from the Signature Aviation terminal. Commission staff must record the number of passengers, including detained individuals, who are loaded and unloaded for purposes of preparing the monthly report required under subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Monthly report. new text end new text begin On the 15th of each month, the commission must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety and state government. The report must include the following information about each flight chartered by ICE Air: new text end new text begin (1) the number of flights arriving at and departing from the Signature Aviation terminal, including the origin and destination; and new text end new text begin (2) the number of detained individuals loaded or unloaded, including the number of detained individuals who are under 18 years of age. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end